New York, session 2025-2026, S3166.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subparagraph (ix) of paragraph (b) of subdivision 9 of 2 section 995-b of the executive law, as added by chapter 737 of the laws 3 of 1994, is amended and a new paragraph (c) is added to read as follows: 4 (ix) such policy shall provide for the mutual exchange, use and stor- 5 age of DNA records with the system of DNA identification utilized by the 6 federal bureau of investigation provided that the commission determines 7 that such exchange, use and storage are consistent with the provisions 8 of this article and applicable provisions of law[.]; and EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD06802-01-5 S. 3166 2 1 (c) within one year of the effective date of this paragraph, deter- 2 mine, consistent with this article, the appropriate minimum period of 3 time that forensic samples of blood, tissue and other biological materi- 4 al, obtained in connection with the forensic examination of crime 5 scenes, should be retained by investigating authorities and the time or 6 specified event or events, if any, after which, consistent with the 7 interest of all persons and law enforcement, such samples may be 8 destroyed, and determine standards for the cataloging and maintaining 9 records of such samples. Pending the promulgation of a policy address- 10 ing the issues set forth in this paragraph, the commission may adopt an 11 interim policy mandating the preservation by investigating authorities 12 of forensic samples of blood, tissue and other biological material 13 obtained in connection with the forensic examination of crime scenes. 14 § 2. Subdivision 1 of section 995-a of the executive law, as added by 15 chapter 737 of the laws of 1994, is amended to read as follows: 16 1. There is hereby created in the executive department, the commission 17 on forensic science, which shall consist of the following [fourteen] 18 sixteen members: (a) the commissioner of the division of criminal 19 justice services who shall be chair of the commission and the commis- 20 sioner [of the department] of health or [his or her] the commissioner of 21 health's designee, who shall serve as an ex-officio member of the 22 commission; 23 (b) [twelve] fourteen members appointed by the governor. 24 § 3. Paragraph (i) of subdivision 2 of section 995-a of the executive 25 law, as added by chapter 737 of the laws of 1994, is amended, paragraph 26 (j) is relettered paragraph (k) and a new paragraph (j) is added to read 27 as follows: 28 (i) two members shall be members-at-large, one of whom shall be 29 appointed upon the recommendation of the temporary president of the 30 senate, and one of whom shall be appointed upon the recommendation of 31 the speaker of the assembly; [and] 32 (j) two members shall be jointly appointed by the temporary president 33 of the senate and the speaker of the assembly: one such person shall be 34 a crime victims advocate, and one such person shall be an expert in 35 biomedical ethics; and 36 § 4. Article 23 and sections 860 and 861 of the judiciary law, as 37 renumbered by chapter 840 of the laws of 1983, are renumbered article 24 38 and sections 1000 and 1001 and a new article 23 is added to read as 39 follows: 40 ARTICLE 23 41 STATE COMMISSION FOR THE INTEGRITY 42 OF THE CRIMINAL JUSTICE SYSTEM 43 Section 900. Definition. 44 901. State commission for the integrity of the criminal justice 45 system. 46 902. Purpose and conduct of the commission. 47 903. Powers and duties. 48 904. Use of reports. 49 § 900. Definition. As used in this article, "commission" shall mean 50 the state commission for the integrity of the criminal justice system 51 established pursuant to section nine hundred one of this article. 52 § 901. State commission for the integrity of the criminal justice 53 system. 1. The state commission for the integrity of the criminal 54 justice system is hereby established as an independent agency of the 55 state. The commission shall consist of ten members as follows: 56 (a) the commissioner of criminal justice services; S. 3166 3 1 (b) four members appointed by the governor, of whom: 2 (i) one shall be a representative of a law enforcement agency, 3 (ii) one shall be a representative of the public criminal defense bar 4 or private criminal defense bar who shall be appointed upon the recom- 5 mendation of an organization with more than seven hundred fifty dues 6 paying members representing such public or private defense services, 7 (iii) one shall be a representative of victims rights advocacy or 8 services organizations, and 9 (iv) one shall be a representative of the forensic science field; 10 (c) a member appointed by the attorney general who shall be a repre- 11 sentative of prosecution services; 12 (d) two members appointed by the chief judge of the court of appeals, 13 of whom: 14 (i) one shall be a retired judge or justice of a New York state court 15 of record, and 16 (ii) one shall be a professor of law or a retired full time professor 17 of law who has taught law school courses in criminal law, criminal 18 procedure, constitutional law, or evidence at an accredited post-gradu- 19 ate college in New York state; 20 (e) one member appointed by the temporary president of the senate, who 21 shall be a member of the public-at-large; and 22 (f) one member appointed by the speaker of the assembly, who shall be 23 a member of the public-at-large. 24 2. The commissioner of criminal justice services shall serve an indef- 25 inite term. The members appointed by the governor shall serve a term of 26 four years. The retired judge or justice appointed by the chief judge 27 shall serve a term of three years. The professor of law or retired 28 professor of law appointed by the chief judge shall serve a term of two 29 years. The members appointed by the attorney general, the temporary 30 president of the senate and the speaker of the assembly shall each serve 31 a term of two years. Each of the members of the commission, except the 32 commissioner of criminal justice services, appointed thereafter shall 33 serve a term of five years. Every vacancy occurring prior to the expi- 34 ration of a member's term shall be filled for the remainder of such term 35 in the manner provided for the original appointment to such term. Upon 36 the expiration of the term of a member of the commission, such member 37 shall continue to serve until their successor is appointed. 38 3. The commission shall elect a chair from amongst its members by a 39 majority vote of the members thereof. 40 4. No member of the commission shall be disqualified from holding any 41 public office or employment, nor shall such member forfeit any such 42 office or employment, by reason of such member's appointment pursuant to 43 this section, and the members of the commission shall be required to 44 take and file oaths of office before serving on the commission. 45 5. The commission shall meet at least four times each year at prede- 46 termined times and locations announced in advance, and at such other 47 times as the chair of the commission or four or more members shall 48 determine to be necessary. 49 6. For any action authorized by this article, five members of the 50 commission shall constitute a quorum and, except as otherwise provided 51 in subdivisions three and five of this section, the concurrence of six 52 members of the commission shall be necessary. 53 7. The members of the commission shall serve without salary or other 54 compensation, but shall be entitled to receive actual and necessary 55 expenses incurred in the discharge of their duties pursuant to this 56 article. S. 3166 4 1 § 902. Purpose and conduct of the commission. The commission shall 2 review any criminal or juvenile case involving a wrongful conviction and 3 recommend reforms to lessen the likelihood of a similar wrongful 4 conviction occurring in the future. 5 Whenever a person who has been convicted of a crime or adjudicated a 6 youthful offender or juvenile delinquent is subsequently determined to 7 be innocent of such crime or offense and exonerated, the commission 8 shall conduct an investigation, hold hearings on and make findings of 9 fact regarding the wrongful conviction in order to determine the cause 10 or causes of the wrongful conviction. 11 Upon the completion of such process, the commission, within sixty 12 days, shall issue a preliminary written report of its findings of fact 13 and conclusions, and any recommendations to prevent wrongful convictions 14 from occurring under similar circumstances in the future. Within one 15 hundred twenty days after issuing such preliminary report, the commis- 16 sion shall issue its report and recommendations concerning the matter. 17 Such report and recommendations shall be made available to the public, 18 and shall be delivered to the governor, attorney general, chief judge of 19 the court of appeals, temporary president of the senate, speaker of the 20 assembly, and to any governmental unit or agency that the commission 21 finds may have been involved in the investigation or adjudication of the 22 wrongful conviction. The commission shall also make available an annual 23 report detailing, at a minimum, the number of cases accepted for formal 24 and informal investigation, the number of completed investigations and 25 the status of on-going or pending investigations. 26 § 903. Powers and duties. The commission shall have the powers and 27 duties to: 28 1. establish its own reasonable rules and procedures concerning the 29 conduct of its meetings and other affairs related to implementing the 30 provisions of this article; 31 2. employ and remove such officers, investigators and employees as it 32 may deem necessary for the performance of its powers and duties pursuant 33 to this article, and fix their compensation within the amounts made 34 available therefor; 35 3. conduct investigations and hearings, administer oaths or affirma- 36 tions, subpoena witnesses, compel their attendance, examine them under 37 oath or affirmation, require production of any books, records, documents 38 or other evidence that it may deem relevant or material to an investi- 39 gation, and may designate any of its members, officers or investigators 40 to exercise any such powers; provided, however, nothing in this subdivi- 41 sion shall authorize the issuance of a subpoena or compelled questioning 42 of the trial court judge or any appellate court judge concerning the 43 judge's mental processes in arriving at any decision in a case; 44 4. request and receive from any court, department, division, board, 45 bureau, commission or other agency of the state or a political subdivi- 46 sion thereof or any public authority such assistance, information, 47 records and data as will enable it to properly carry out its powers and 48 duties; 49 5. issue preliminary reports on any investigation conducted pursuant 50 to this article, which preliminary reports shall include findings of 51 fact and recommendations, and invite any party directly involved in the 52 wrongful conviction, which is the subject of the report, to submit a 53 reply within sixty days to the commission concerning the findings of 54 fact and recommendations in the report. Any such reply shall be made 55 available by the commission, together with any response by the commis- 56 sion thereto, to the parties listed in section nine hundred two of this S. 3166 5 1 article as part of the commission's report and recommendations concern- 2 ing the matter; and 3 6. do all other things necessary and convenient to carry out the 4 provisions of this article. 5 § 904. Use of reports. No preliminary report, report or portion there- 6 of issued pursuant to this article shall be admitted into evidence or 7 used in any civil or criminal cause of action relating to a matter which 8 is the subject of such report. 9 § 5. Section 1.20 of the criminal procedure law is amended by adding a 10 new subdivision 46 to read as follows: 11 46. "Special fictitious name indictment" means an indictment of a 12 person whose name is unknown but whose identity is established to the 13 satisfaction of a grand jury pursuant to subdivision one of section 14 190.65 of this chapter by means of forensic deoxyribonucleic acid (DNA) 15 testing of evidence. The caption of a special fictitious name indictment 16 shall include a fictitious name, such as "John Doe" or "Jane Doe", in 17 place of the name of the defendant whose true name is unknown. 18 § 6. Subdivision 3 of section 190.65 of the criminal procedure law is 19 amended to read as follows: 20 3. Upon voting to indict a person, a grand jury must, through its 21 [foreman] foreperson or acting [foreman] foreperson, file an indictment 22 with the court by which it was impaneled. When the name of the indicted 23 person is unknown but their identity is established to the satisfaction 24 of the grand jury pursuant to subdivision one of this section by means 25 of forensic deoxyribonucleic acid (DNA) testing of evidence, then such 26 indictment shall be filed by the grand jury with such court as a special 27 fictitious name indictment. The authority to file a special fictitious 28 name indictment pursuant to this subdivision shall be in addition to any 29 other authority in law for the filing of an indictment when the name of 30 an indicted person is unknown. 31 § 7. Section 995-c of the executive law is amended by adding a new 32 subdivision 10 to read as follows: 33 10. A superior court, in response to a motion for such comparison by a 34 defendant, may order that DNA information from a crime scene sample or 35 samples and/or fingerprints or DNA information obtained in the course of 36 the investigation of an alleged crime be checked against the DNA records 37 maintained by or available through the state DNA identification index 38 established pursuant to this section and the national DNA index system, 39 and against the fingerprint records maintained by or available through 40 the state fingerprint record database established pursuant to subdivi- 41 sion seven of section eight hundred thirty-seven of this chapter and the 42 national fingerprint identification system, and that the results of such 43 check or checks be disclosed to such defendant and to the prosecutor 44 whose jurisdiction includes the location of the alleged commission of 45 such crime, upon a showing by the defendant that such an analysis may be 46 material to their defense and that the request is reasonable. 47 § 8. Subparagraph 1 of paragraph (a) of subdivision 1-a of section 48 440.30 of the criminal procedure law, as amended by chapter 19 of the 49 laws of 2012, is amended to read as follows: 50 (1) Where the defendant's motion requests the performance of a foren- 51 sic DNA test on specified evidence, and upon the court's determination 52 that any evidence containing deoxyribonucleic acid ("DNA") was secured 53 in connection with the investigation or trial resulting in the judgment, 54 the court shall grant the application for forensic DNA testing of such 55 evidence upon its determination that if a DNA test had been conducted on 56 such evidence, and if the results had been available to the defendant, S. 3166 6 1 or the results had been admitted in the trial resulting in the judgment, 2 there exists a reasonable probability that the disposition or verdict 3 would have been more favorable to the defendant. 4 § 9. Subdivisions 3 and 5 of section 8-b of the court of claims act, 5 as added by chapter 1009 of the laws of 1984, are amended to read as 6 follows: 7 3. In order to present the claim for unjust conviction and imprison- 8 ment, claimant must establish by documentary evidence that: 9 (a) [he has] they have been convicted of one or more felonies or 10 misdemeanors against the state and subsequently sentenced to a term of 11 imprisonment, and has served all or any part of the sentence; and 12 (b) (i) [he has] they have been pardoned upon the ground of innocence 13 of the crime or crimes for which [he was] they were sentenced and which 14 are the grounds for the complaint; or (ii) [his] their judgment of 15 conviction was reversed or vacated, and the accusatory instrument 16 dismissed or, if a new trial was ordered, either [he was] they were 17 found not guilty at the new trial or [he was] they were not retried and 18 the accusatory instrument dismissed; provided that the [judgement] judg- 19 ment of conviction was reversed or vacated[, and the accusatory instru- 20 ment was dismissed,] on any of the following grounds: (A) paragraph (a), 21 (b), (c), (e), (f) or (g) of subdivision one of section 440.10 of the 22 criminal procedure law; or (B) subdivision one (where based upon grounds 23 set forth in item (A) [hereof] of this subparagraph), two, three (where 24 the count dismissed was the sole basis for the imprisonment complained 25 of) or five of section 470.20 of the criminal procedure law; or (C) 26 comparable provisions of the former code of criminal procedure or subse- 27 quent law; or (D) the statute, or application thereof, on which the 28 accusatory instrument was based violated the constitution of the United 29 States or the state of New York; or (E) the claimant's conviction was 30 vacated under another section of law not enumerated in items (A), (B), 31 (C) and (D) of this subparagraph, but whose application to claimant's 32 conviction involved facts and circumstances that directly support claim- 33 ant's assertion of innocence; and provided that, in cases where the 34 conviction may have been vacated on more than one ground, including one 35 of the grounds enumerated in items (A), (B), (C) and (D) of this subpar- 36 agraph, the court of claims shall not be bound by a decision of the 37 criminal court vacating the conviction based only on a ground not 38 enumerated in items (A), (B), (C) and (D) of this subparagraph; and 39 (c) [his] their claim is not time-barred by the provisions of subdivi- 40 sion seven of this section. 41 5. In order to obtain a judgment in [his] their favor, claimant must 42 prove by clear and convincing evidence that: 43 (a) [he has] they have been convicted of one or more felonies or 44 misdemeanors against the state and subsequently sentenced to a term of 45 imprisonment, and has served all or any part of the sentence; and 46 (b) (i) [he has] they have been pardoned upon the ground of innocence 47 of the crime or crimes for which [he was] they were sentenced and which 48 are the grounds for the complaint; or (ii) [his] their judgment of 49 conviction was reversed or vacated, and the accusatory instrument 50 dismissed or, if a new trial was ordered, either [he was] they were 51 found not guilty at the new trial or [he was] they were not retried and 52 the accusatory instrument dismissed; provided that the [judgement] judg- 53 ment of conviction was reversed or vacated[, and the accusatory instru- 54 ment was dismissed,] on any of the following grounds: (A) paragraph (a), 55 (b), (c), (e), (f) or (g) of subdivision one of section 440.10 of the 56 criminal procedure law; or (B) subdivision one (where based upon grounds S. 3166 7 1 set forth in item (A) [hereof] of this subparagraph), two, three (where 2 the count dismissed was the sole basis for the imprisonment complained 3 of) or five of section 470.20 of the criminal procedure law; or (C) 4 comparable provisions of the former code of criminal procedure or subse- 5 quent law; or (D) the statute, or application thereof, on which the 6 accusatory instrument was based violated the constitution of the United 7 States or the state of New York; or (E) the claimant's conviction was 8 vacated under another section of law not enumerated in items (A), (B), 9 (C) and (D) of this subparagraph, but whose application to claimant's 10 conviction involved facts and circumstances that directly support claim- 11 ant's assertion of innocence; and provided that, in cases where the 12 conviction may have been vacated on more than one ground, including one 13 of the grounds enumerated in items (A), (B), (C) and (D) of this subpar- 14 agraph, the court of claims shall not be bound by a decision of the 15 criminal court vacating the conviction based only on a ground not 16 enumerated in items (A), (B), (C) and (D) of this subparagraph; and 17 (c) [he] they did not commit any of the acts charged in the accusatory 18 instrument or [his] their acts or omissions charged in the accusatory 19 instrument did not constitute a felony or misdemeanor against the state, 20 provided that, where one indictment contains multiple counts arising 21 from separate complaints or incidents, the court shall consider any 22 claim related to specified counts in the indictment arising out of only 23 one of the complaints or incidents; and 24 (d) [he] they did not by [his] their own conduct cause or bring about 25 [his] their conviction. 26 § 10. Section 995-b of the executive law is amended by adding a new 27 subdivision 14 to read as follows: 28 14. The commission shall review the confidentiality safeguards which 29 are maintained with respect to DNA samples before and after information 30 from such samples is encoded into the state DNA identification index and 31 shall determine whether any additional confidentiality safeguards are 32 necessary with respect to such samples. The commission shall also issue 33 a report to the majority leader of the senate and the speaker of the 34 assembly which describes how such samples are retained and the reasons 35 for maintaining such samples, following the encoding of information from 36 such samples into the state DNA identification index. Such report shall 37 also recommend whether a program to destroy any such samples, following 38 the encoding of information from such samples into the state DNA iden- 39 tification index, should be initiated or whether, alternatively, such 40 samples shall continue to be maintained. 41 § 11. Subdivision 2 of section 995-c of the executive law, as added by 42 chapter 737 of the laws of 1994, is amended to read as follows: 43 2. (a) Following the review and approval of the plan by the DNA 44 subcommittee and the commission and the filing of such plan with the 45 speaker of the assembly and the temporary president of the senate, the 46 commissioner of criminal justice services is hereby authorized to estab- 47 lish a computerized state DNA identification index pursuant to the 48 provisions of this article. No other DNA identification index or compi- 49 lation of DNA identification profiles may be maintained in this state 50 provided, however, that this prohibition shall not be interpreted to 51 prohibit any such index or compilation of DNA information obtained from 52 crime scene samples or concerning missing persons. 53 (b) In accordance with subdivision one of this section and this subdi- 54 vision, and in a manner consistent with this article, the commission may 55 authorize the inclusion of DNA records derived from forensic examination 56 of crime scenes in the state DNA identification index. S. 3166 8 1 § 12. Paragraph (b) of subdivision 9 of section 995-c of the execu- 2 tive law, as added by chapter 524 of the laws of 2002, is amended and 3 two new paragraphs (c) and (d) are added to read as follows: 4 (b) As prescribed in this paragraph, if an individual, either volun- 5 tarily or pursuant to a warrant or order of a court, has provided a 6 sample for DNA testing in connection with the investigation or prose- 7 cution of a crime and (i) no criminal action against the individual 8 relating to such crime was commenced within the period specified by 9 section 30.10 of the criminal procedure law, or (ii) a criminal action 10 was commenced against the individual relating to such crime which 11 resulted in a complete acquittal, or a dismissal and the matter will not 12 be tried or retried, or (iii) a criminal action against the individual 13 relating to such crime resulted in a conviction that was subsequently 14 reversed or vacated, or for which the individual was granted a pardon 15 pursuant to article two-A of this chapter, such individual may apply to 16 the supreme court or the court in which the judgment of conviction was 17 originally entered for an order directing the expungement of any DNA 18 record and any samples, analyses, or other documents relating to the DNA 19 testing of such individual in connection with the investigation or pros- 20 ecution of such crime. A copy of such application shall be served on the 21 district attorney and an order directing expungement may be granted if 22 the court finds that the individual has satisfied the conditions of one 23 of the subparagraphs of this paragraph; that if a judgment of conviction 24 was reversed or vacated, all appeals relating thereto have been 25 concluded and the individual will not be retried, or, if a retrial has 26 occurred, the trier of fact has rendered a verdict of complete acquit- 27 tal, and that expungement will not adversely affect the investigation or 28 prosecution of some other person or persons for the crime. Nothing in 29 this paragraph shall prevent a court, at an earlier time, from ordering 30 expungement in the manner specified in this paragraph in the interests 31 of justice, in response to an application made on notice to the district 32 attorney by the person who provided such DNA sample. If an order direct- 33 ing the expungement of any DNA record and any samples, analyses or other 34 documents relating to the DNA testing of such individual is issued, such 35 record and any samples, analyses, or other documents shall, at the 36 discretion of the possessor thereof, be destroyed or returned to such 37 individual or to the attorney who represented [him or her] them in 38 connection with the application for the order of expungement. The person 39 destroying or returning such record, samples, analyses and other docu- 40 ments shall maintain a record certifying the date, time and manner of 41 destruction or return and identifying the person or persons destroying 42 or returning same. The person destroying or returning same shall send a 43 copy of this record to the person who submitted the sample or to the 44 attorney who represented them in connection with the application for the 45 order of expungement. 46 (c) (i) Except as provided in paragraph (d) of this subdivision, if an 47 individual has provided a sample for DNA testing in connection with the 48 investigation or prosecution of a crime, other than in response to a 49 demand authorized pursuant to subdivisions one, two and three of this 50 section, or if a sample for DNA testing has otherwise come into the 51 custody or possession of a law enforcement agency or an agent thereof, 52 and the DNA profile derived from such sample does not match a DNA 53 profile derived from crime scene evidence developed in connection with 54 the investigation or prosecution of a criminal act or acts, every 55 record, sample, analysis and other document relating to the DNA testing 56 of such sample shall, at the discretion of the possessor thereof, be S. 3166 9 1 either returned to the individual who provided such sample, destroyed or 2 maintained for the duration of the investigation, prosecution or adjudi- 3 cation of such criminal acts exclusively for use with respect to the 4 investigation, prosecution and/or adjudication of the criminal charges 5 for which such sample was obtained or with respect to any other criminal 6 acts which the investigating agency has reason to believe may be linked 7 to such sample; provided, however, that no later than five years after 8 such sample is obtained or when the investigation or prosecution of such 9 crime has concluded, whichever first occurs, such records, samples, 10 analyses and other documents shall, at the discretion of the possessor 11 thereof, be returned to such individual or destroyed, or sealed in a 12 manner consistent with paragraph (c) and subparagraph (ii), (iv) or (v) 13 of paragraph (d) of subdivision one of section 160.55 of the criminal 14 procedure law. 15 (ii) The person returning, destroying or sealing such record, samples, 16 analyses or other documents in accordance with this paragraph shall 17 maintain a record certifying the date and manner of such return, 18 destruction or sealing and identifying the person or persons returning, 19 destroying or sealing same. The person returning, destroying or sealing 20 same shall send a copy of this record to the person who submitted the 21 sample. 22 (iii) This paragraph shall supplement and not supplant any applicable 23 provision of paragraph (b) of this subdivision. This paragraph shall not 24 apply to DNA records, samples, analyses and other documents obtained 25 from the forensic examination of crime scene evidence, where the DNA 26 profile developed from such crime scene evidence does not match the DNA 27 profile of a known person. 28 (d) Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraphs (a), (b) and (c) of 29 this subdivision, a DNA record which was obtained from a sample provided 30 pursuant to paragraph (a) or (b) of this subdivision prior to the effec- 31 tive date of this paragraph need not be destroyed, returned or sealed, 32 and may be included in the state DNA identification index established 33 pursuant to this article, when, as of the effective date of this para- 34 graph, the person who provided such sample stands convicted of a felony 35 or misdemeanor defined in section nine hundred ninety-five of this arti- 36 cle. All laws governing DNA records included in the state DNA identifi- 37 cation index shall apply to any DNA record included in the state DNA 38 identification index pursuant to this paragraph. 39 § 13. Section 995-d of the executive law is amended by adding two new 40 subdivisions 3 and 4 to read as follows: 41 3. In accordance with the provisions of this subdivision, any individ- 42 ual DNA profile obtained or maintained by a state, county or local law 43 enforcement agency, or an agent thereof, from a biological sample 44 submitted in the manner described in paragraph (b) or (c) of subdivision 45 nine of section nine hundred ninety-five-c of this article, may be 46 compared individually or via computerized database to one or more DNA 47 profiles maintained pursuant to or in accordance with subdivisions one, 48 two and three of section nine hundred ninety-five-c of this article, 49 and/or may be individually compared by such state, county or local law 50 enforcement agency, or an agent thereof, to one or more DNA profiles 51 developed from the forensic examination of crime scenes in one or more 52 cases under investigation. 53 (a) If such individual DNA profile matches the DNA profile developed 54 from the forensic examination of one or more crime scenes in one or more 55 cases under investigation, and/or one or more DNA profiles maintained 56 pursuant to subdivisions one, two and three of section nine hundred S. 3166 10 1 ninety-five-c of this article, such individual DNA profile, together 2 with the biological material from which such individual DNA profile was 3 developed, may, as appropriate pursuant to applicable laws and rules of 4 evidence and consistent with this article, be used in connection with 5 the investigation, prosecution and/or adjudication of such person. 6 (b) If such individual DNA profile does not match the DNA profile 7 developed from forensic examination of one or more crime scenes in one 8 or more cases under investigation, and/or one or more DNA profiles main- 9 tained pursuant to subdivisions one, two and three of section nine 10 hundred ninety-five-c of this article, such individual DNA profile, 11 together with the biological material from which such individual DNA 12 profile was developed, shall be dealt with in accordance with paragraph 13 (c) of subdivision nine of section nine hundred ninety-five-c of this 14 article. 15 4. (a) Except where the demand is pursuant to a court order or warrant 16 or pursuant to subdivision three of section nine hundred ninety-five-c 17 of this article, prior to requesting a biological sample from an indi- 18 vidual that will be used for DNA testing, the police department, law 19 enforcement agency, or agent thereof requesting such sample shall obtain 20 written informed consent from such individual consisting of written 21 authorization in plain language that is dated and signed and includes at 22 least the following: (1) a general description of the test; (2) a state- 23 ment that the DNA sample of the subject may initially be compared 24 against any crime scene evidence or database of crime scene evidence and 25 a description of whether, in the event such subject sample does not 26 match a DNA profile derived from any such crime scene evidence, such 27 subject sample will thereafter be returned, destroyed or retained. In 28 the event the agent requesting such sample may retain such sample, such 29 statement shall describe the circumstances under which such sample may 30 thereafter be lawfully used; (3) the name of the person or specific 31 categories of persons or organizations to whom the test results may be 32 disclosed; (4) a statement that no tests other than those authorized 33 shall be performed on the biological sample; and (5) a summary of the 34 information set forth in paragraphs (b) and (c) of subdivision nine of 35 section nine hundred ninety-five-c of this article. 36 (b) Noncompliance with any provision of this subdivision shall not in 37 and of itself affect the admissibility of evidence or otherwise affect 38 any conviction or criminal prosecution. 39 § 14. Section 340.20 of the criminal procedure law is amended by 40 adding a new subdivision 5 to read as follows: 41 5. Prior to accepting a defendant's plea of guilty to a count or 42 counts of an information charging a misdemeanor, as defined in paragraph 43 (a) of subdivision two of section 55.10 of the penal law and included in 44 the definition of designated offender pursuant to subdivision seven of 45 section nine hundred ninety-five of the executive law, the court shall 46 advise the defendant that upon the conviction for such misdemeanor they 47 will be required to provide a sample appropriate for DNA testing for 48 inclusion in the state DNA identification index pursuant to article 49 forty-nine-B of the executive law. The court shall affirm on the record 50 or in writing that the defendant has been given the notice required by 51 this subdivision. The failure of a court to advise the defendant pursu- 52 ant to this subdivision or to otherwise comply with the provisions of 53 this subdivision shall not be deemed to affect the voluntariness of a 54 plea of guilty or the validity of a conviction. 55 § 15. Subdivision 1-a of section 440.30 of the criminal procedure law 56 is amended by adding a new paragraph (d) to read as follows: S. 3166 11 1 (d) In conjunction with the filing of a motion under this subdivision, 2 the court may direct the state to provide the movant with information, 3 including documents, notes, logs or reports, relating to any physical 4 items collected in connection with the case, where it is likely any such 5 physical items, if subjected to DNA testing, would yield DNA information 6 that meets the standard set forth in paragraph (a) of this subdivision. 7 The court may direct the state to provide other reasonable assistance to 8 the movant in locating any such records or items of physical evidence 9 which may have been lost or destroyed. The court may also direct the 10 people to take reasonable measures to attempt to locate any such records 11 or physical items that may be in government custody and/or assist the 12 movant in locating any such records or physical items that may be in the 13 custody of a public or private hospital, laboratory or other facility. 14 The court shall deny a request for assistance brought under this para- 15 graph if the court determines that such request for assistance is frivo- 16 lous, abusive or inappropriate. 17 § 16. The state finance law is amended by adding a new section 97-uuuu 18 to read as follows: 19 § 97-uuuu. Assistance to police and crime laboratories: DNA evidence 20 fund. 1. There is hereby created in the custody of the state comp- 21 troller a special fund to be known as the "assistance to police and 22 crime laboratories: DNA evidence fund". 23 2. Such fund shall consist of all monies appropriated for the purpose 24 of such fund, all other monies credited or transferred to such fund 25 pursuant to law, all monies required by the provisions of this section 26 or any other law to be paid into or credited to such account, and all 27 monies received by the account or donated to it. 28 3. Monies of such fund shall be available for appropriation and allo- 29 cation to the division of state police, to local police agencies, and to 30 forensic DNA laboratories in this state, as defined in subdivision two 31 of section nine hundred ninety-five of the executive law, to assist such 32 entities in effectively collecting, testing and analyzing forensic DNA 33 crime scene evidence pursuant to article forty-nine-B of the executive 34 law. Fifty percent of such funds shall be made available for appropri- 35 ation or allocation by the commissioner of criminal justice services for 36 the purpose of funding an innocence research project program in this 37 state. 38 4. Monies of such fund shall be paid out on the audit and warrant of 39 the comptroller on vouchers certified or approved by the commissioner of 40 criminal justice services. 41 § 17. Innocence research project program. 1. There is hereby estab- 42 lished in this state an innocence research project program. Funding 43 shall be made available for the purposes of such program to up to three 44 not-for-profit organizations by the commissioner of criminal justice 45 services pursuant to subdivisions 3 and 4 of section 97-uuuu of the 46 state finance law. 47 2. The innocence research project program shall review and study cases 48 in which there appears to be a reasonable possibility that a person 49 charged with or convicted of a crime in this state may be innocent of 50 the crime or crimes charged. Such program may provide legal and other 51 expert assistance, and may also provide relevant training, including but 52 not limited to training in the use of DNA evidence for forensic iden- 53 tification purposes, to attorneys engaged in the defense of criminal 54 cases. 55 3. Each not-for-profit organization receiving funding for such program 56 shall file an annual report with the commissioner of criminal justice S. 3166 12 1 services summarizing the activities of the program during the previous 2 year. Such report shall be filed within one year after such organization 3 first receives funding under such program, and annually thereafter for 4 so long as the program receives such funding. 5 4. Before providing assistance to any individual believed to be actu- 6 ally innocent of the crime or crimes charged, the organization-based 7 coordinator of such program shall determine whether such individual is 8 financially able to pay for the proposed services or assistance to be 9 provided. If such individual is able to financially afford to pay for 10 such services or assistance, such coordinator shall request and receive 11 such payment or payments on behalf of the program from such individual. 12 All monies received from individuals pursuant to this subdivision shall 13 be promptly forwarded by such coordinator to the state comptroller, for 14 deposit into the "assistance to police and crime laboratories: DNA 15 evidence fund" established pursuant to section 97-uuuu of the state 16 finance law. 17 § 18. The criminal procedure law is amended by adding a new section 18 60.51 to read as follows: 19 § 60.51 Rules of evidence; electronic recording of statements of defend- 20 ants. 21 1. Definitions. As used in this section: 22 (a) "Electronic recording" means a contemporaneous video and audio 23 recording, or where video recording is impracticable, a contemporaneous 24 audio recording. 25 (b) "Custodial interrogation" means any interrogation which is 26 conducted in a place of detention and during which a reasonable person 27 in the subject's position would consider themself to be in custody. 28 (c) "Place of detention" means a police station, correctional facili- 29 ty, holding facility for prisoners, or other government facility where 30 persons are held in detention in connection with criminal charges which 31 have been or may be filed against them. 32 2. During the prosecution of a felony, an oral, written, or sign 33 language statement of a defendant made during a custodial interrogation 34 shall be presumed inadmissible as evidence against a defendant in a 35 criminal proceeding unless an electronic recording is made of the custo- 36 dial interrogation in its entirety and the recording is substantially 37 accurate and not intentionally altered. 38 3. If the court finds that the defendant was subjected to a custodial 39 interrogation in violation of subdivision two of this section, then any 40 statements made by the defendant following that custodial interrogation, 41 even if otherwise in compliance with this section, are also presumed 42 inadmissible. 43 4. The people may rebut a presumption of inadmissibility through clear 44 and convincing evidence that the statement was both voluntary and reli- 45 able and: 46 (a) exigent circumstances existed necessitating interrogation at a 47 place in a location other than a police station, correctional facility, 48 or holding facility for prisoners and where the requisite recording 49 equipment was not readily available; 50 (b) the accused refused to have their interrogation electronically 51 recorded, and the refusal itself was electronically recorded; or 52 (c) the failure to electronically record an entire interrogation was 53 the result of equipment failure and obtaining replacement equipment was 54 not feasible. 55 5. Nothing in this section precludes the admission of: S. 3166 13 1 (a) a statement made by the accused in open court at their trial, 2 before grand jury, or at a preliminary hearing; 3 (b) a spontaneous statement that is not made in response to interro- 4 gation; 5 (c) a statement made after questioning that is routinely asked during 6 the processing of the arrest of the suspect; 7 (d) a statement made during a custodial interrogation that is 8 conducted out-of-state; 9 (e) a statement obtained by a federal law enforcement officer in a 10 federal place of detention; 11 (f) a statement given at a time when the interrogators are unaware 12 that a felony has in fact occurred; or 13 (g) a statement, otherwise inadmissible under this section, that is 14 used only for impeachment and not as substantive evidence. 15 6. The people shall not destroy or alter any electronic recording made 16 of a custodial interrogation until such time as the defendant's 17 conviction for any offense relating to the interrogation is final and 18 all direct and habeas corpus appeals are exhausted, or the prosecution 19 of that offense is barred by law. 20 § 19. Subdivision 7 of section 995 of the executive law, as amended by 21 chapter 715 of the laws of 2021, is amended to read as follows: 22 7. "Designated offender" means a person convicted of [any felony 23 defined in any chapter of the laws of the state or any misdemeanor 24 defined in the penal law except: (a) a person convicted of prostitution 25 under section 230.00 of the penal law, or (b) a person whose partic- 26 ipation in the offense is determined by a court to have been a result of 27 having been a victim of sex trafficking under section 230.34 of the 28 penal law, sex trafficking of a child under section 230.34-a of the 29 penal law, or trafficking in persons under the trafficking victims 30 protection act (United States Code, Title 22, Chapter 78)] and sentenced 31 for a misdemeanor defined in the penal law or a felony defined in the 32 penal law, or a person who is required to register as a sex offender 33 pursuant to article six-C of the correction law. 34 § 20. This act shall take effect immediately; provided, however, that: 35 (a) sections eleven, twelve and thirteen of this act shall take effect 36 on the one hundred twentieth day after it shall have become a law; 37 (b) the amendments to section 340.20 of the criminal procedure law 38 made by section fourteen of this act shall apply to pleas of guilty to a 39 count or counts of an information entered 60 days or more after the 40 effective date of this act; 41 (c) section eighteen of this act shall take effect on the ninetieth 42 day after it shall have become a law, and shall apply to any criminal 43 proceeding commenced on and after such date; and 44 (d) section nineteen of this act shall apply to designated offenses 45 committed on or after the effective date of this act, as well as to 46 designated offenses committed prior to such effective date, where 47 service of the sentence imposed upon conviction of such designated 48 offense has not been completed prior to such effective date.